apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_vb.en.dix
<pardef n="t/ake__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ake</l>
          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ake</l>
          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>akes</l>
          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ook</l>
          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>aken</l>
          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aking</l>
          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aking</l>
          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aking</l>
          <r>ake<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>      
    
<pardef n="f/ind__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ind</l>
          <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ind</l>
          <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inds</l>
          <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ound</l>
          <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>ound</l>
          <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inding</l>
          <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inding</l>
          <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inding</l>
          <r>ind<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>     
    
<pardef n="b/ite__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ite</l>
          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ite</l>
          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ites</l>
          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>it</l>
          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>itten</l>
          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iting</l>
          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iting</l>
          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iting</l>
          <r>ite<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
<pardef n="ble/ed__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eds</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eding</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eding</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eding</l>
          <r>ed<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>  
    
<pardef n="bles/s__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ses</l>
          <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>sed</l>
          <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>sed</l>
          <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sing</l>
          <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sing</l>
          <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sing</l>
          <r>s<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>     
    
<pardef n="bl/ow__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ow</l>
          <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ow</l>
          <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ows</l>
          <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ew</l>
          <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>own</l>
          <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owing</l>
          <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owing</l>
          <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owing</l>
          <r>ow<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef> 
    
<pardef n="br/ing__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ings</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ought</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>ought</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inging</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inging</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inging</l>
          <r>ing<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>   
    

<e lm="bring"><i>br</i><par n="br/ing__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="find"><i>f</i><par n="f/ind__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="grow"><i>gr</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="know"><i>kn</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="take"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="throw"><i>thr</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bring down"><i>br</i><par n="br/ing__vblex"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="bring together"><i>br</i><par n="br/ing__vblex"/><p><l><b/>together</l><r><g><b/>together</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take advantage of"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>advantage<b/>of</l><r><g><b/>advantage<b/>of</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take away"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>away</l><r><g><b/>away</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take care"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>care</l><r><g><b/>care</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take into account"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>into<b/>account</l><r><g><b/>into<b/>account</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take off"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>off</l><r><g><b/>off</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="take out"><i>t</i><par n="t/ake__vblex"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="find out"><i>f</i><par n="f/ind__vblex"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="flow"><i>fl</i> <par n="bl/ow__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bite"><i>b</i> <par n="b/ite__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="shake"><i>sh</i> <par n="t/ake__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="blow"><i>bl</i><par n="bl/ow__vblex"/></e>
